src/phonology/cor-phon.xfscript
!! !!!Cornish morph-phon grammar file


!! This is the file for the morphophonological rules.

!! We keep a verbose style, at each point we tell what we will do.
! That is the echo commands.

!! !!Definitions

echo << We define our definitions >>

! Here, we have left some documentation for curious readers:

!! ^S = 2 = soft mutation						     \\
!! ^A = 3 = breathed mutation					     \\
!! ^P = 4 = hard mutation						     \\
!! ^M = 5 = mixed mutation						     \\
!! ^V = vowel affection							     \\
!! ^E = triggers o to e in agent suffix			     \\
!! ^D = no mutation dummy for immutable words	     \\
!! ^CD = triggers consonant doubling in subjunctive  \\
!! ^TRUNC = 									     \\

!! These triggers are given a name, so that we can delete them when
!! they have done their job.

!! * DummySymbols
define DummySymbols [ %^S | %^A | %^P | %^M | %^V | %^E | %^D | 
               %^TRUNC | %^CD | %^UML | %^STDEL ] ;

!! * Boundary
define Boundary  %> ;

!! * Dummy
define Dummy [ DummySymbols | Boundary ] ;

!! * Vow 
define Vow   [ a | e | i | o | u | e3 | a4 | o4 | 
               A | E | I | O | U  ] ;
!! * Cns 
define Cns   [ b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | 
               B | C | D | F | G | H | J | K | L | M | N | P | Q | R | S | 
               t | v | w | x | z |
               T | V | W | X | Z ] ;

!! * Yy 
define Yy [ y | Y ] ;               

! Werden wir <y> nicht auch in der Liste der Vokale brauchen?
! hmm, ich sehe dein punkt.
! z.B. in der gh > h-Regel: byghan > byhan. Müssen wir y1 vs. y2 machen?
! vielleicht 3 gruppen
! Vow Cns y


!! * Symbols 
define Symbols [ %- ] ;
               
!! * Sgm 
define Sgm   [ Vow | Cns | Yy | Dummy | Symbols | Archi ] ;

!! !!Rules

!! Here the action begins.

echo << We define our rules >>

!! !Mutations
echo << ... first the mutations >>

!! !identity
define identity [ g -> g , G -> G || .#. _ ] ;

!! gsoft: 
!! If we encounter a final %^S symbol, we delete an initial g
define gsoft [ g -> 0 , G -> 0 || .#. _ [a|e|i|l|r|w|y] [ Sgm ]* %^S ] ;

!! Etc for changing g to h in front of %^M, etc.
define gmixed [ g -> h , G -> H || .#. _ [a|e|i|w|y] [Sgm]* %^M ] ;

!! Then we generalise:
!! softmut p -> b etc. in front of %^S
define softmut [ p -> b , t -> d , k -> g , 
                 P -> B , T -> D , K -> G ,
                 b -> v , d -> d h , 
                 B -> V , D -> D h ,
                 m -> v , c h -> j ,
                 M -> V , C h -> J || .#. _ [Sgm]* %^S ] ;

!! Change gw to g with gwsimplification
define gwsimplification [ w -> 0 || .#. [g|G] _ (r) [o|u] [Sgm]* (Dummy - %^S) ] ;

!! Aspirant mutation p > f etc. in front of %^A
define aspmut [ p -> f, P -> F , t -> t h , T -> T h || .#. _ [Sgm]* %^A ] ;

!! k to h in front of %^A with kaspmut
define kaspmut [ k -> h , K -> H || .#. _ ~[l|r] [Sgm]* %^A ] ;

!! !The other consonant rules
echo << then other consonant rules >>
 
!! Devoicing b -> p etc. in front of %^P
define prov [ b -> p , d -> t , g -> k ,
              B -> P , D -> T , G -> K || .#. _ [Sgm ]* %^P ] ;

!! Voiced plosive to fric with mixed in front of %^M
define mixed [ b -> f , d -> t , m -> f ,
               B -> F , D -> T , M -> F || .#. _ [Sgm ]* %^M ] ;

!define cluster [ w -> 0 || g _ r [Sgm]* [%^D|%^P]];

!! Nonmutation as identity when we do not have triggers.
!! Hmm, why is this needed?
define Nonmutation [ a -> a, e -> e, o -> o, y -> y, u -> u, i -> i, f -> f,
                     h -> h, j -> j, l -> l, n -> n, r -> r, s -> s, 
                     v -> v, w -> w || .#. _ [Sgm]* [ ~[%^A|%^S|%^M|%^P] ] ] ;

!! ConsonantDoublingI bdg in front of %^CD
define ConsonantDoublingI  b -> p p , g -> k k , d -> t t || _ ([l|r]) %^CD ;

!! ConsonantDoublingII t in front of %^CD
define ConsonantDoublingII t -> t t || Vow _ h (Vow) %^CD ;
! this probably holds for more than t. Check also left context in next rule.

!! ConsonantDoublingIII  various cns in front of %^CD
define ConsonantDoublingIII d h -> t h , h -> g h ,
                           f   -> f f , k -> k k , l -> l l , m -> m m , n -> n n ,
                           p   -> p p , r -> r r , s -> s s , t -> t t , v -> f f ,
                           h e -> h a h a , j -> c h || Vow _ (Vow) %^CD ;
! note! added left context Vow!!! check this. TT.

!! Devoicing b -> p
define Devoicing b -> p || Vow _ %> s ;
! enebi > enepsi

!! Deleting light stem vowel with LightStemVow
define LightStemVow  Vow -> 0 || _ (Dummy) [ %^TRUNC %> Vow ] ;
!define LightStemVow  Vow -> 0 || _ (Dummy)  %^TRUNC ;
 ! a r h a %^V %^TRUNC .#. ->  a r h %^V %^TRUNC .#.


define NoFinalH   h -> g h || Cns Vow (l|r) _ Dummy* .#. ,,
 				  g h -> h || Cns Vow (l|r) _ %> [Vow|l|r] ;                             
 ! a r h  %^V %^TRUNC .#. -> a r g h %^V %^TRUNC .#.

define STDEL t -> 0 || _ %> %^STDEL ;

echo << ... then the rest >>

define VowelAffection [ a -> e, e -> y, o -> e || _ Sgm* %^V ] ;

define OtoE           [ o -> e || _ [ r %^E ] ] ;
  
  
define LightSuffixEK e3 -> o || _ Cns %> o w ;

!! AuslautHerdung
!define AuslautHerdung f -> v , t -> d , p -> b , k -> g || _ (Dummy) %> Vow ;

!! Umlaut of e3, a4, ... in %^UML contexts
define Umlaut a4 -> e , o4 -> e || _ Sgm* [ %> y o n | %^UML ] ; 
! Always Uml if affix. Then Uml if no affix, but when %^UML mark

! The triggers have done their work
! The order of rules here is not crucial, crucial is the order below:
! But it is a good idea to have the same rule here as well.
! Dummydeletion comes last:

echo << We tidy up our dummys >>

!! ArchiPhonemes should not be on the surface
define ArchiPhonemes         e3 -> e , a4 -> a , o4 -> o ;

define DummyDeletion [ DummySymbols -> 0 ] ;  ! For use for speller generation
define DummyDeletion [ Dummy -> 0 ] ;         ! For normal use

!! !!Compilation

!! Then we compile, one rule after another.

echo << We compile it all >>

read regex [ Nonmutation
.o. identity
.o. gsoft
.o. gmixed
.o. softmut 
!.o. gwsimplification
.o. aspmut 
.o. kaspmut 
.o. prov
.o. mixed
.o. Nonmutation
.o. ConsonantDoublingI
.o. ConsonantDoublingII
.o. ConsonantDoublingIII
.o. Devoicing
.o. LightStemVow
.o. NoFinalH
.o. STDEL
.o. VowelAffection
.o. OtoE
.o. LightSuffixEK
!.o. AuslautHerdung
.o. Umlaut
.o. ArchiPhonemes
.o. DummyDeletion 
] ;
